Utah statutes.
53A-13-106.    Instruction in firearm safety -- Purpose -- School districts
to implement volunteer education classes -- Parental consent exception.
(1) (a)  School districts may permit the use of district approved volunteers
or school district teachers for instruction of firearm safety education
classes for students.
(b)  The volunteers or school district teachers instructing the firearm safety
education class are encouraged to utilize donated materials prepared by
firearms training and education organizations or to develop their own
materials within existing budgets.
(2)  The purpose of firearm safety education is to:
(a)  develop the knowledge, habits, skills, and attitudes necessary for the
safe handling of firearms; and
(b)  help students avoid firearm injuries.
(3)  School districts may offer firearm safety instruction to students in
grades kindergarten through four to teach them that in order to avoid injury
when they find a firearm they should:
(a)  not touch it;
(b)  tell an adult about finding the firearm and its location; and
(c)  be able to share the instruction provided in Subsections (3)(a) and (b)
with any other minors who are with them when they find a firearm.
(4)  As used in this chapter, "firearm" means any firearm as defined in
Section 76-10-501.
(5)  The State Board of Education shall make rules promulgated pursuant to
Title 63G, Chapter 3, Utah Administrative Rulemaking Act, for:
(a)  use of certified volunteers for instruction of firearm safety education
classes in the public schools;
(b)  use of public school classrooms or auditoriums for these classes;
(c)  school district review of donated materials before their use; and
(d)  proof of certification as a firearm safety instructor.
(6) (a)  A local school board may require every student in grades kindergarten
through six to participate in a firearm safety education class offered within
the public schools under this section.
(b)  A student may be exempted from participation upon notification to the
local school by the student's parent or legal guardian that the parent or
legal guardian wants the student exempted from the class in its entirety or
any portion specified.
(7)  If a student is exempted under Subsection (6), the school may provide
other activities during the period of time in which the student would
otherwise be participating in the program.
(8)  The school districts may permit the Division of Wildlife Resources, local
law enforcement agencies, peace officers as defined in Title 53, Chapter 13,
Peace Officer Classifications, certified instructors, certified hunter
education instructors, and other certified firearms safety instructors, as
provided by rules adopted under Subsection (5)(a) to teach the firearm safety
education class on a voluntary basis.
(9)  The school district is encouraged to maximize the use of existing firearm
safety educational materials which are available at minimal or no cost and the
use of certified volunteer instructors.
(10)  The school district may review the class on a regular basis for its
effectiveness.
